Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 30. Wine Board.

§ 3.2-3000.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Enology”
means those practices and that body of knowledge involved in the production, aging, storing, and packaging of wine.

“Farm winery”
or

“winery”

means an “establishment” as defined in §

4.1-100

.

“Grape grower”
means a commercial grower who: (i) sells at least $10,000 worth of grapes annually; or (ii) has planted and maintains at least three acres of vines of a type used for the production of wine.

“Viticulture”
means the cultivation and study of grapes and grapevines.

“Wine”
means an alcoholic beverage as defined in §

4.1-100

.

“Winegrower”
means any person or entity producing wine from approved products grown by that individual.

History.

2004, cc. 89, 319, § 3.1-1064.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3001.
Wine Board; purpose; composition and appointment of members; quorum; meetings.

The Wine Board is established within the Department. The purpose of the Wine Board is to foster the development of the Virginia wine industry by expanding viticulture and enological research, increasing education, and promoting the production of grapes and wine in the Commonwealth.

The Wine Board shall consist of 10 members, nine of whom shall be voting nonlegislative citizen members, to be appointed by the Governor, and the tenth shall be the Commissioner, who shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be citizens of the Commonwealth and shall be either grape growers or owners or operators of a winery or farm winery in the Commonwealth. The Governor shall make his appointments upon consideration of the recommendations made by any grape grower, an owner or operator of a winery or farm winery, or the following agricultural organizations or their successor organizations: the Virginia Wineries Association, Inc.; the Virginia Vineyards Association, Inc.; the Virginia Farm Bureau; and the Virginia Agribusiness Council. Each entity or person shall submit two or more recommendations for each available position at least 90 days before the expiration of the member’s term for which the recommendation is being provided. If said entities or persons fail to provide the nominations at least 90 days before the expiration date pursuant to this section, the Governor may appoint other nominees that meet the foregoing criteria.

A majority of the members of the Wine Board shall constitute a quorum, but a two-thirds vote of the members present shall be required for passage of items taken up by the Wine Board. The Wine Board shall meet at least four times each year. The meetings of the Wine Board shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

History.

2004, cc. 89, 319, §§ 3.1-1064.2, 3.1-1064.3; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 691, 714.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “tenth” for “10th” preceding “shall be the Commissioner” in the first sentence and added the last two sentences.

§ 3.2-3002.
Wine Board membership terms; vacancies.

Initial appointments of nonlegislative citizen members to the Wine Board shall be staggered as follows: six nonlegislative citizen members shall be owners or operators of wineries or farm wineries in Virginia, two of whom shall serve for terms of three years, two shall serve for terms of two years, and two shall serve a term of one year; and three nonlegislative citizen members shall be grape growers with no controlling financial interest in a winery or farm winery, one of whom shall serve a term of three years, one shall serve a term of two years, and one shall serve a term of one year. Thereafter, nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed for a term of four years. The Commissioner shall serve a term coincident with his term of office. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. All members may be reappointed. No nonlegislative citizen member shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

History.

2004, cc. 89, 319, § 3.1-1064.3; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3003.
Wine Board officers and compensation.

The Wine Board shall elect a chairman and other officers as deemed necessary from among its membership.

Members of the Wine Board shall receive no compensation for the discharge of their duties but the nonlegislative citizen members shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for expenses of the nonlegislative citizen members shall be provided from the Virginia Wine Promotion Fund established under §

3.2-3005

.

History.

2004, cc. 89, 319, § 3.1-1064.3; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3004.
Powers and duties of the Wine Board.

The Wine Board shall have the following powers and duties:

To receive and dispense funds or donations from the Virginia Wine Promotion Fund;

To enter into contracts for the purpose of developing new or improved markets or marketing methods for wine and grape products;

To contract for research services to improve viticulture and enological practices in Virginia;

To enter into agreements with any local, state, or national organization or agency engaged in education for the purpose of disseminating information on wine or other viticulture projects;

To enter into contracts with private or public entities for the purpose of developing marketing, advertising and other promotional programs designed to promote the orderly growth of Virginia’s wine industry;

To rent or purchase office and laboratory space, land, equipment, and supplies as necessary to carry out its duties;

To employ such personnel as may be required to carry out those duties conferred by law;

To acquire any licenses or permits necessary for the performance of the powers and duties of the Wine Board;

To cooperate with other state, regional, national, and international organizations in research, education, and promotion of the growing of grapes and the production of wine in the Commonwealth and to expend moneys from the Fund for such purposes;

To adopt a general statement of policy and procedures; and

To receive from the Chairman of the Wine Board an annual report, including a statement of total receipts and disbursements for the year, and file a copy of such report with the Commissioner.

History.

2004, cc. 89, 319, § 3.1-1064.5; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3005.
Virginia Wine Promotion Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Wine Promotion Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. The Fund shall consist of all moneys appropriated to it by the General Assembly, grants of private or government funds designated for specified activities authorized pursuant to this chapter, fees for services rendered pursuant to this chapter, payments for products, equipment, or material or other goods supplied. All moneys shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the duly authorized officer of the Wine Board.

The Wine Board shall meet and evaluate proposals from applicants for funding from the Fund. The Wine Board’s final recommendations shall be made by recorded vote. Not less than one-third of the funding allocated by the Wine Board annually, excluding revenue-producing activities engaged in pursuant to §

3.2-3006

, shall be expended for projects that advance viticulture and enological research concerning the growing of grapes and the production of wine in Virginia.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall audit all accounts as provided in § 30-133.

History.

2004, cc. 89, 319, § 3.1-1064.6; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to collection, computation and distribution of tax on wine, see §

4.1-235

.

§ 3.2-3006.
Revenue-producing activities of the Wine Board.

To help defray the costs of its program, the Wine Board may: (i) publish materials with printed advertisements; (ii) sell printed materials; (iii) rent exhibit space at meetings or other events; (iv) charge entrance or participation fees; and (v) engage in other revenue-producing activities related to research, education, and promotion of the growing of grapes and the production of wine in Virginia. The Wine Board shall promptly deposit the proceeds of any revenue-producing activities into the Fund. The provisions of Article 3 (§

2.2-1109

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 2.2 and of Articles 1 (§

2.2-4300

et seq.), 2 (§

2.2-4303

et seq.), 3 (§

2.2-4343

et seq.), and 5 (§

2.2-4357

et seq.) of Chapter 43 of Title 2.2 shall not apply to contracts for advertising, marketing, or publishing entered into by the Wine Board. The provisions of Articles 4 (§

2.2-4347

et seq.) and 6 (§

2.2-4367

et seq.) of Chapter 43 of Title 2.2 shall apply to such contracts.

History.

2004, cc. 89, 319, § 3.1-1064.7; 2008, c. 860.